Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Telephone Cooperatives
279.480.
Dissolution.

Any corporation formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

may be dissolved by filing articles of dissolution, which shall be entitled and indorsed “Articles of Dissolution of _____________________________________ ” and shall state:

The name of the corporation and, if it is a consolidated corporation, the names of the original corporations.

The date of filing of the articles of incorporation and, if the corporation is a consolidated corporation, the dates on which the articles of incorporation of the original corporations were filed.

That the corporation elects to dissolve.

The name and post office address of each of its directors, and the name, title and post office address of each of its officers.

The articles of dissolution shall be subscribed and acknowledged in the same manner as original articles of incorporation, by the president or a vice president and the secretary or an assistant secretary, who shall make and attach an affidavit stating that they have been authorized to execute and file the articles by a majority vote of all the members, and shareholders.

Articles of dissolution shall be filed, recorded and approved in the same manner, and shall take effect upon approval, as is provided in KRS

279.350

for articles of incorporation.

The corporation filing articles of dissolution shall continue in existence for the purpose of paying, satisfying and discharging any existing liabilities or obligations and collecting or liquidating its assets, and doing all other acts required to adjust and wind up its business and affairs, and may sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with in its corporate name. Any assets remaining after the liabilities and obligations of the corporation have been satisfied or discharged shall be ratably distributed to the shareholders, members and nonmember patrons of the corporation in accordance with the manner in which their respective rights may appear.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 18.

279.490.
Fees for articles and amendments — No recording taxes.

For acting upon, filing and recording articles of incorporation, articles of consolidation, articles of dissolution, or amendments to articles of incorporation or consolidation, the corporation shall pay to the Secretary of State a sum not to exceed two dollars ($2), for which the Secretary of State shall give his receipt.

For filing and recording articles of incorporation, articles of consolidation, articles of dissolution, or amendments to articles of incorporation or consolidation, the corporation shall pay to the county clerk a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

, for which the county clerk shall give his receipt.

No fee shall be paid or received for affixing the state seal to any of the documents mentioned in this section or to any copy thereof.

The recordation of the documents mentioned in this section shall be exempt from all recording taxes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 22; 2006, ch. 255, § 22, effective January 1, 2007.

279.500.
Nonprofit operation.

A cooperative shall be operated on a nonprofit basis for the mutual benefit of its members and patrons. The bylaws of a cooperative or its contracts with members and patrons shall contain such provisions relative to the disposition of revenue and receipts as may be necessary and appropriate to establish and maintain its nonprofit and cooperative character. In the case of a cooperative authorized to issue shares of stock, such bylaws or contracts shall provide that no moneys shall be paid or credits given on the basis of patronage except after the declaration or payment of dividends on the outstanding shares of stock in accordance with the articles of incorporation of the cooperative, and such bylaws or contracts shall otherwise be consistent with the cooperative’s obligations in respect of such shares of stock.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 19.

279.510.
Obligations, how issued, secured, purchased or redeemed — Power of board of trustees to encumber or dispose of property.

The board of trustees of a cooperative shall have full power and authority, without authorization by the members thereof, to authorize the execution and delivery of a mortgage or mortgages or a deed or deeds of trust of, or the pledging or encumbering of, any or all of the property, assets, rights, privileges, licenses, franchises and permits of the cooperative, whether acquired or to be acquired, and wherever situated as well as the revenues therefrom, all upon such terms and conditions as the board of trustees shall determine, to secure any indebtedness of the cooperative to the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof. Any such mortgage or mortgages or deed or deeds of trust shall be exempt from mortgage recordation tax.

A cooperative may not otherwise sell, mortgage, lease or otherwise dispose of or encumber all or a substantial portion of its property unless such sale, mortgage, lease or other disposition or encumbrance is authorized by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of all the members of the cooperative; provided however, that notwithstanding any other provision of KRS

279.310

to

279.600

, or any other provision of law, the board of trustees may, upon the authorization of a majority of those members of the cooperative present at a meeting of the members thereof, the notice of which shall have set forth the proposed action, sell, lease or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial portion of its property to another cooperative or a foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

or to the holder or holders of any notes, bonds or other evidences of indebtedness issued to the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 20.

279.520.
Recordation of mortgages — Effect thereof.

Any mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument executed by a cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

, which affects real and personal property and which is recorded in the real property records in any county in which such property is located or is to be located, shall have the same force and effect as if the mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument were also recorded, filed or indexed as provided by law in the proper office in such county as a mortgage of personal property. All after-acquired property of such cooperative or foreign corporation described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged in any such mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument, shall become subject to the lien thereof immediately upon the acquisition of such property by such cooperative or foreign corporation, whether or not such property was in existence at the time of the execution of such mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument. Recordation of any such mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument shall constitute notice and otherwise have the same effect with respect to such after-acquired property as it has under the laws relating to recordation, with respect to property owned by such cooperative or foreign corporation at the time of the execution of such mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument and therein described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged thereby. The lien upon personal property of any such mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument shall, after recordation thereof, continue in existence and of record for the period of time specified therein without the refiling thereof or the filing of any renewal certificate, affidavit or other supplemental information required by the laws relating to the renewal, maintenance or extension of liens upon personal property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 21.

279.530.
Taxes.

Corporations formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall be exempt from all profit taxes, gross and net taxes, sales taxes, occupation taxes, privilege taxes, income taxes, taxes on telephone service and from all excise taxes whatsoever, any statute now existing or hereafter passed to the contrary notwithstanding. In lieu of all other state, county, city and district taxes, except ad valorem and franchise taxes, corporations formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall pay to the State Treasurer an annual tax of ten dollars ($10).

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 23.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A cooperative organized under the provisions of KRS

279.310

to

279.590

is, by virtue of this section, exempt from paying for city license tags for its vehicles and from the payment of city unloading license fees.

OAG 68-156

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Sales, use or excise taxes, rural coops not exempt, KRS

138.730

,

139.520

,

139.530

.

279.540.
Jurisdiction of Public Service Commission — Application of other laws.

Every corporation formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall be subject to the general supervision of the Public Service Commission, and shall be subject to all the provisions of KRS

278.010

to

278.450

inclusive, and KRS

278.530

and

278.990

.

The provisions of the general corporation laws of this state and all rights and powers thereunder shall apply to corporations organized under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of KRS

279.310

to

279.600

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 24.

279.550.
Securities act exemption.

The provisions of KRS Chapter 292 shall not apply to any note, bond or other evidence of indebtedness issued by any cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

to the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or to any mortgage, deed of trust or other instrument executed to secure the same. The provisions of said securities act shall not apply to the issuance of membership certificates, shares of stock or any other evidence of member, shareholder or patron interest by any cooperative or any such foreign corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 25.

279.560.
Districts.

The bylaws may provide for the division of the territory served or to be served by a cooperative into two (2) or more districts for any purpose, including without limitation, the nomination and election of trustees and the election and functioning of district delegates. Such delegates, who shall be members, may nominate and elect trustees. The bylaws shall prescribe the boundaries of the districts, or the manner of establishing such boundaries, and the manner of changing such boundaries, and the manner in which such districts shall function. No member at any district meeting and no district delegate at any meeting shall vote by proxy or by mail.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 26.

279.570.
Foreign corporations.

Any foreign nonprofit or cooperative corporation furnishing or authorized to furnish telephone service and owning or operating telephone lines or facilities in an adjacent state may construct or acquire extensions of such lines in this state and operate such extensions without complying with any statute of this state pertaining to the qualifications of foreign corporations for the doing of business in this state. Any such corporation shall, before constructing or operating such extensions, by an instrument executed and acknowledged on its behalf by its president or vice president, under its seal attested by its secretary, and filed with the Secretary of State, designate the Secretary of State its agent to accept service of process on its behalf. Thereafter, with respect to its operations in this state, such corporation shall have only the rights, powers, privileges and immunities of, and shall be subject to all of the laws of this state relating to the jurisdiction and supervision of the Public Service Commission in the same manner and to the same extent as, a cooperative organized under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

. In the event any process shall be served upon the Secretary of State, he shall forthwith forward the same by certified mail, return receipt requested to such corporation at the address thereof specified in the aforesaid instrument.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 27; 1974, ch. 315, § 44; 1980, ch. 114, § 66, effective July 15, 1980.

279.580.
Construction standards — Safety.

Construction of telephone lines and facilities by a cooperative shall, as a minimum requirement, comply with the standards of the National Electrical Safety Code in effect at the time of such construction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 28.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Poles and wires not to obstruct roads, KRS

179.250

.

279.590.
Easements.

Two (2) years’ continuous, uncontested maintenance of telephone lines on any real property by a cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall ripen into legal title to such easement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 29.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section, dealing with easements for rural telephone cooperatives, is not also applicable to rural electric cooperatives.

OAG 82-556

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Condemnation, KRS

416.150

.

Poles and wires not to obstruct roads, KRS

179.250

.

279.600.
Effect and construction of KRS 279.310 to 279.590.

KRS

279.310

to

279.590

are complete in themselves and shall be controlling. They shall be construed liberally. The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods or things.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 30.

279.990.
Penalties.

Any person referred to in KRS

279.150

, or any officer, agent or employee in an official capacity of such person, who knowingly or willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

279.150

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than two (2) years, or both, and each day that the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

883j-24.